apertium-cv-tt.tt.lexc
LEXICON ALEX

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} # ; 

ADVLEX ; ! Allow all adjectives to derive as adverbs

LEXICON V-PERS-S1 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>ҡ CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3-NO1SG

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;

V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-S4 ! Volition endings

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-FUT-IR

%<fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLIT ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLIT ; ! Dir/LR 
%<ger6%>:%>%{I%}р POSS ;
%<neg%>%<ger6%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{I%}р POSS ;

LEXICON V-FUT-AR

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLIT ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLIT ; ! Dir/LR 
%<ger6%>:%>%{A%}р POSS ;
%<neg%>%<ger6%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{A%}р POSS ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-FORMS

%<pres%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-S1 ; 
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ; 
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S3 ; 

LEXICON V-COMMON-LEX

V-FINITE-FORMS ; 

%<ger1%>:%>м%{A%}%{K%} POSS ; 
%<ger2%>:%>%{I%}п POSS ; 
%<ger3%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}ч POSS ; 
%<ger4%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нч%{I%} POSS ; 
%<ger5%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н POSS ;
%<ger7%>:%>%{A%}ч%{A%}к POSS ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{E%}с V-PERS-S4 ;
%<cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;

LEXICON V-NEG

%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 

V-COMMON-LEX ; 

LEXICON V-DER

%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-NEG ;
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-NEG ;

V-NEG ;

LEXICON V-IV-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-FUT-IR ; 

LEXICON V-IV-AR-LEX

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-AR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-FUT-AR ; 

LEXICON VAUX

%<vaux%>: V-PERS-S2 ;

LEXICON PRNLEX-PERS

мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:мин # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:минем # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:миңа # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:мине # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:миндә # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:миннән # ; 

син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:син # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:синең # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:сиңа # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:сине # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:синдә # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:синнән # ; 

ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ул # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:аның # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аңа # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:аны # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:анда # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:аннан # ; 

без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:без # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:безнең # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:безгә # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:безне # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:бездә # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:бездән # ; 

сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:сез # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:сезнең # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:сезгә # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:сезне # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:сездә # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:сездән # ; 

алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:алар # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:аларның # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:аларга # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:аларны # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:аларда # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:алардан # ; 

LEXICON PRNDEM-BU

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бу # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:моның # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:моңа # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:моны # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:монда # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:моннан # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:бо%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON PRNDEM-ŠUL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:шул # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:шуның # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:шуңа # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:шуны # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:шунда # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:шуннан # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:шул%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON PRNITGLEX

%<prn%>%<itg%>: POSS ; 

LEXICON PRNREFLEX

%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSS ; 


LEXICON DETINDLEX

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ; 


LEXICON DETDEMLEX

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ; 

LEXICON DETQNTLEX 

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ; 

LEXICON POSTLEX

%<post%>: # ; 

LEXICON POSTADVLEX

%<postadv%>: # ; 


LEXICON ADVITGLEX

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADVLEX

%<adv%>: CLIT ; 

LEXICON CCLEX

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CALEX

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 


LEXICON PREDLEX

%<pred%>: CLIT ; 

LEXICON PREDLEX-I

%<pred%>%<ger5%>:%>кән POSS ;
%<pred%>%<ifi%>:%>де V-PERS-S2 ;        


LEXICON QSTLEX

%<qst%>: # ; 

LEXICON ABBR 

%<abbr%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Conjunctions

вә:вә CCLEX ; ! ""
һәм:һәм CCLEX ; ! ""
ә:ә CCLEX ; ! ""
әмма:әмма CCLEX ; ! ""

да:да CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/RL
да:да CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:та CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:дә CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:тә CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR

шуңа% күрә:шуңа% күрә CALEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Postpositions 

белән:белән POSTLEX ; ! ""
инде:инде POSTLEX ; ! ""
өчен:өчен POSTLEX ; ! ""
аркылы:аркылы POSTLEX ; ! ""
аша:аша POSTLEX ; ! ""
кирәк:кирәк POSTLEX ; ! ""
каршы:каршы POSTLEX ; ! ""
башка:башка POSTLEX ; ! ""
карамастан:карамастан POSTLEX ; ! ""
астында:астында POSTLEX ; ! "" FIXME: Check

LEXICON Postadverbs

гына:%~гына POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/RL
гына:гына POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:генә POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:кына POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:кенә POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR


LEXICON Pronouns

PRNLEX-PERS ; 

ни:ни PRNITGLEX ; ! ""
нимә:нимә PRNITGLEX ; ! ""
кем:кем PRNITGLEX ; ! ""

бу: PRNDEM-BU ; ! ""
шул: PRNDEM-ŠUL ; ! ""

үз:үз PRNREFLEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Determiners

бу:бу DETDEMLEX ; ! ""
шул:шул DETDEMLEX ; ! ""

бөтен:бөтен DETQNTLEX ; ! ""

бер:бер DETINDLEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Numerals 

бер:бер NUMLEX ; ! ""
ике:ике NUMLEX ; ! ""
өч:өч NUMLEX ; ! ""
дүрт:дүрт NUMLEX ; ! ""
биш:биш NUMLEX ; ! ""
алты:алты NUMLEX ; ! ""
җиде:җиде NUMLEX ; ! ""
сигез:сигез NUMLEX ; ! ""
тугыз:тугыз NUMLEX ; ! ""

ун:ун NUMLEX ; ! ""
йөз:йөз NUMLEX ; ! ""
мең:мең NUMLEX ; ! ""

LEXICON ProperNouns

Татарстан:Татарстан NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Русия:Русия NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Рәсәй:Рәсәй NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Башкортстан:Башкортстан NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Казан:Казан NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Пермь:Пермь NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Уфа:Уфа NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Петербур:Петербур NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
АКШ:АКШ NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Алмания:Алмания NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
Германия:Германия NPTOPLEX ; ! ""
СССР:СССР NPTOPLEX ; ! ""

Әхмәт:Әхмәт NPANTMLEX ; ! ""
Гөлнара:Гөлнара NPANTFLEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Adjectives 
соңгы:соңгы ALEX ; ! ""
ерак:ерак ALEX ; ! ""
билгеле:билгеле ALEX ; ! ""
кызыл:кызыл ALEX ; ! ""
менә% дигән:менә% дигән ALEX ; ! ""
бөек:бөек ALEX ; ! ""
шәхси:шәхси ALEX ; ! ""
шәп:шәп ALEX ; ! ""
сәер:сәер ALEX ; ! ""
бу:бу ALEX ; ! ""
иң% мөһим:иң% мөһим ALEX ; ! ""
иңле:иңле ALEX ; ! ""
аерым:аерым ALEX ; ! ""
кеше:кеше ALEX ; ! ""
юан:юан ALEX ; ! ""
эре:эре ALEX ; ! ""
бертуган:бертуган ALEX ; ! ""
билгесез:билгесез ALEX ; ! ""
бик% яхшы:бик% яхшы ALEX ; ! ""
ирекле% булмаган:ирекле% булмаган ALEX ; ! ""
тыныч:тыныч ALEX ; ! ""
ягымлы:ягымлы ALEX ; ! ""
вак:вак ALEX ; ! ""
көләч:көләч ALEX ; ! ""
сәләтле:сәләтле ALEX ; ! ""
туры:туры ALEX ; ! ""
юеш:юеш ALEX ; ! ""
сау:сау ALEX ; ! ""
бәләкәй:бәләкәй ALEX ; ! ""
хайван:хайван ALEX ; ! ""
йомшак:йомшак ALEX ; ! ""
икътисадый:икътисадый ALEX ; ! ""
LEXICON Verbs
бар:бар PREDLEX ; ! ""
юк:юк PREDLEX ; ! ""
и:и PREDLEX-I ; ! ""
бул:бул V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
тор:тор V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
йөр:йөр V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
кит:кит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кил:кил V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
көл:көл V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
утыр:утыр V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
йокла:йокла V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
кайт:кайт V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
кара:кара V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
бәс:бәс V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ишет:ишет V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
күзәт:күзәт V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
йөгер:йөгер V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
бет:бет V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
яшерен:яшерен V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
сөйлә:сөйлә V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
әйлән:әйлән V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
бас:бас V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
гомер% ит:гомер% ит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
яшә:яшә V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
чык:чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
ят:ят V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кит:кит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
килеп% чык:килеп% чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
чык:чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
аякка% бас:аякка% бас V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кит:кит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
тын:тын V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
йокла:йокла V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
тукта:тукта V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
чап:чап V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кач:кач V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
килеп% чык:килеп% чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
барып% чык:барып% чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
мен:мен V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кит:кит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
уңышлы% бет:уңышлы% бет V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
күн:күн V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
көлемсерә:көлемсерә V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
җит:җит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
баш% каг:баш% каг V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
килеп% чык:килеп% чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
яр:яр V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
күз% ташла:күз% ташла V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кит:кит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
эш% ит:эш% ит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
ярдәм% ит:ярдәм% ит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
өлгер:өлгер V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
сөйлә:сөйлә V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
уйла:уйла V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кара:кара V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
яса:яса V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
башла:башла V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
көт:көт V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
тап:тап V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
карар% ит:карар% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
яз:яз V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
хәтердә% тот:хәтердә% тот V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
хәтерлә:хәтерлә V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кара:кара V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
сиз:сиз V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
үт:үт V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
тот:тот V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
ата:ата V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
сөйлә:сөйлә V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
сөйлә:сөйлә V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
уйна:уйна V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
ата:ата V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
алып% ташла:алып% ташла V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
эч:эч V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
ата:ата V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
исемлә:исемлә V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
тәкъдим% ит:тәкъдим% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
сора:сора V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
тукма:тукма V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
җырла:җырла V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
бүләк% ит:бүләк% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
рөхсәт% ит:рөхсәт% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
өстә:өстә V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
күр:күр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ал:ал V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
җавап% бир:җавап% бир V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
хәл% ит:хәл% ит V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
бел:бел V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
курк:курк V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
алып% бар:алып% бар V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
үт:үт V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
тотып% тор:тотып% тор V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
җибәр:җибәр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
калдыр:калдыр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
булдыр:булдыр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
булдыра% ал:булдыра% ал V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
үтеп% бар:үтеп% бар V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
тапшыр:тапшыр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
аңлат:аңлат V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
бир:бир V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
үтер:үтер V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
тәкъдим% ит:тәкъдим% ит V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
алып% кил:алып% кил V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
үткәр:үткәр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
югалт:югалт V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
кире% бир:кире% бир V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
барлыкка% китер:барлыкка% китер V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
җибәр:җибәр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
файдалан:файдалан V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
өйрән:өйрән V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
